Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.730

Employee assistance program—Information confidential—Exceptions.

Individual employees' participation in the employee assistance program and all individually identifiable information gathered in the process of conducting the program shall be held in strict confidence; except that agency management may be provided with the following information about employees referred by that agency management due to poor job performance:

(1) Whether or not the referred employee made an appointment;

(2) The date and time the employee arrived and departed;

(3) Whether the employee agreed to follow the advice of counselors; and

(4) Whether further appointments were scheduled.

Participation or nonparticipation by any employee in the employee assistance program shall not be a factor in any decision affecting an employee's job security, promotional opportunities, corrective or disciplinary action, or other employment rights.

[ 1990 c 60 s 304.]

NOTES:

Severability—Subheadings not law—1990 c 60: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.